languages/apertium-gla/apertium-gla.gla.dix
    <pardef n="/ann__pr">
      <e><p><l>ann</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>anns</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anns</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anns</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anns</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>annam</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annad</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ann</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>innte</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annainn</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annaibh</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>annta</l><r>ann<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/e__pr">
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hiom</l><r>e<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hiot</l><r>e<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>heth</l><r>e<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hith</l><r>e<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hinn</l><r>e<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hibh</l><r>e<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hiubh</l><r>e<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/o__pr">
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>han</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>han</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>han</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>han</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>homh</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hut</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ha</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hi</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>huinn</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>huibh</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hiubh</l><r>o<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ea/dar__pr">
      <e><p><l>dar</l><r>dar<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>darainn</l><r>dar<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>daraibh</l><r>dar<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>torra</l><r>dar<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fo__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dham</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dhad</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dha</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idhpe</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dhainn</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dhaibh</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>odhpa</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="le__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>am</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>at</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atha</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inn</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ibh</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>otha</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/mu__pr">
      <e><p><l>mu</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umam</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umad</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uime</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uimpe</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umainn</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umaibh</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>umpa</l><r>mu<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ann"><i></i><par n="/ann__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="de"><i>d</i><par n="d/e__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="do"><i>d</i><par n="d/o__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="eadar"><i>ea</i><par n="ea/dar__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="fo"><i>fo</i><par n="fo__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="le__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mu"><i></i><par n="/mu__pr"/></e>
